Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state has made significant progress in establishing and implementing the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline, creating greater access to crisis services for individuals and their families in need. The legislature further finds that an improved crisis response system reduces reliance on emergency room services and the use of law enforcement response to behavioral health crises and helps to stabilize individuals in the community whenever possible. To accomplish effective crisis response and suicide prevention, Washington state must continue its integrated approach to address mental health and substance use disorder and continue its progress toward implementing the 988 suicide and crisis lifelines and crisis systems in the country. The legislature finds it is critical to provide funding to enable greater access to crisis care services and supports.Sec. 2. RCW 82.86.020 and 2021 c 302 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line tax is imposed on the use of all radio access lines:(i) By subscribers whose place of primary use is located within the state in the amount set forth in (a)(ii) of this subsection (1) per month for each radio access line. The tax must be uniform for each radio access line under this subsection (1); and(ii) By consumers whose retail transaction occurs within the state in the amount set forth in this subsection (1)(a)(ii) per retail transaction. The amount of tax must be uniform for each retail transaction under this subsection (1) and is as follows:(A) Beginning October 1, 2021, through December 31, 2022, the tax rate is 24 cents for each radio access line; ((and))(B) Beginning January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2025, the tax rate is 40 cents for each radio access line; and(C) Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax rate is 70 cents for each radio access line.(b) The tax imposed under this subsection (1) must be remitted to the department by radio communications service companies, including those companies that resell radio access lines, and sellers of prepaid wireless telecommunications service, on a tax return provided by the department. Tax proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer into the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account created in RCW 82.86.050.(c) For the purposes of this subsection (1), the retail transaction is deemed to occur at the location where the transaction is sourced under RCW 82.32.520(3)(c).(2) A statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line tax is imposed on all interconnected voice over internet protocol service lines in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of voice over internet protocol service lines on an account that is capable of simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection (2) must be remitted to the department by interconnected voice over internet protocol service companies on a tax return provided by the department. The amount of tax for each interconnected voice over internet protocol service line whose place of primary use is located in the state is as follows:(a) Beginning October 1, 2021, through December 31, 2022, the tax rate is 24 cents for an interconnected voice over internet protocol service line; ((and))(b) Beginning January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2025, the tax rate is 40 cents for an interconnected voice over internet protocol service line; and(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax rate is 70 cents for an interconnected voice over internet protocol service line.(3) A statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line tax is imposed on all switched access lines in the state. The amount of tax must be uniform for each line and must be levied on no more than the number of switched access lines on an account that is capable of simultaneous unrestricted outward calling to the public switched telephone network. The tax imposed under this subsection (3) must be remitted to the department by local exchange companies on a tax return provided by the department. The amount of tax for each switched access line whose place of primary use is located in the state is as follows:(a) Beginning October 1, 2021, through December 31, 2022, the tax rate is 24 cents for each switched access line; ((and))(b) Beginning January 1, 2023, through December 31, 2025, the tax rate is 40 cents for each switched access line; and(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, the tax rate is 70 cents for each switched access line.(4) Tax proceeds collected pursuant to this section must be deposited by the treasurer into the statewide 988 behavioral health crisis response and suicide prevention line account created in RCW 82.86.050.--- END ---